Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-101.01
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-101 to 8-1,140 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Banking Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 32;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB891, § 1.